Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202529-4316
Criminal justice agencies and attorneys; maintain confidentiality of victim of sexual assault or sex trafficking.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Criminal justice agency has the same meaning as in section 29-3509;

(b) Sex trafficking means sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor in violation of section 28-831; and

(c) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320, 28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-1805 or subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section 28-707.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and unless otherwise required by statute, a criminal justice agency and any attorney involved in the investigation or prosecution of an alleged sexual assault or sex trafficking violation shall maintain the confidentiality of the identity and personal identifying information of the alleged victim. Such information may be shared by such criminal justice agencies and between such criminal justice agencies and attorneys as necessary to carry out their duties.

(3) The confidentiality required by subsection (2) of this section does not apply:

(a) To the extent waived by the alleged victim;

(b) If criminal charges involving the alleged sexual assault or sex trafficking are filed;

(c) If the victim has died as a result of, or in connection with, the alleged sexual assault or sex trafficking;

(d) In cases where personal identifying information or the identity of the victim are released as part of a child abduction alert system used by law enforcement agencies, such as the AMBER Alert system;

(e) To a person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect as required in section 28-711;

(f) To the sharing of reports and information regarding child abuse and neglect with a child abuse and neglect investigation team or child abuse and neglect treatment team provided for in section 28-728;

(g) To the Department of Health and Human Services and other assisting agencies as necessary to carry out their duties in investigations of child abuse or neglect;

(h) To communication with an individual that an educational entity, as defined in section 79-1201.01, has designated:

(i) As a Title IX coordinator; or

(ii) To receive reports related to sexual assault or sex trafficking or to provide supportive measures related to such reports; or

(i) To communication with advocates and health care providers as defined in section 29-4309.

Laws 2022, LB1246, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 22.